Nevada, session 83, AB539.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 232 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. To the extent that money is available, the Department may
establish and carry out a program for the placement of career
coaches in middle schools and junior high schools.
2. The program established pursuant to subsection 1 must be
designed to provide pupils enrolled in middle school or junior high
school with information and guidance, inside or outside the
classroom, for:
(a) The exploration of career pathways; and
(b) The development of knowledge, training and skills required
for career readiness, including, without limitation, financial
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
literacy, and the opportunities available for such development in
high school.
3. For the purpose of establishing and carrying out the
program described in subsection 1, the Department:
(a) Shall:
(1) Collaborate with any appropriate persons or entities,
including, without limitation, a state agency, school district or
other local governmental agency, chamber of commerce,
nonprofit organization, trade association and regional
development authority, as defined in NRS 231.009; and
(2) Prioritize the placement of career coaches in middle
schools and junior high schools that are located in zip codes with
high levels of unemployment; and
(b) May:
(1) Apply for and accept any gift, donation, grant or other
source of money; and
(2) Within the limits of available money, enter into
contracts with or award grants to persons or entities that have the
appropriate expertise to provide any services or resources
necessary to assist the Department in establishing or carrying out
the program.
Sec. 2. NRS 232.900 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.900 As used in NRS 232.900 to 232.990, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. “Department” means the Department of Employment,
Training and Rehabilitation.
2. “Director” means the Director of the Department.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)